Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202668-1119
Reimbursement; schedule.

The department shall reimburse each area agency on aging operating an aging and disability resource center on a schedule agreed to by the department and the area agency on aging. If a partnering organization has contracted with the department for the purpose of providing services described in the Aging and Disability Resource Center Act, the department shall reimburse the partnering organization on a schedule agreed to by the department and the partnering organization. Such reimbursement shall be made from (1) state funds appropriated by the Legislature, (2) federal funds allocated to the department for the purpose of establishing and operating aging and disability resource centers, and (3) other funds as available.

Laws 2015, LB320, § 9;

Laws 2018, LB793, § 8;

Laws 2022, LB856, § 3.